Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2481
Legislative consent to foreign laws.

Legislative consent is hereby given to the application of the laws of other states with respect to taxation payments in lieu of taxes and the assessment thereof to any agency which has acquired an interest in a project or property situated outside the state or which owns or operates a project outside the state and to the application of regulatory and other laws of other states and of the United States to any agency in relation to the acquisition, ownership, and operation by such agency of projects situated outside this state.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 81.